Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Niyyah Recovery Initiative to fund support program costs, community engagement, staffing, and targeted high-impact outreach to expand recovery services and provide critical support to individuals affected by substance use. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end